Maryland, session 2026, HB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–203.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person may not:
(i) wear, carry, or transport a handgun, whether concealed or open,
on or about the person;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1061*

HOUSE BILL 1061
(ii) wear, carry, or knowingly transport a handgun, whether
concealed or open, in a vehicle traveling on a road or parking lot generally used by the
public, highway, waterway, or airway of the State;
(iii) violate item (i) or (ii) of this paragraph while on public school
property in the State;
(iv) violate item (i) or (ii) of this paragraph with the deliberate
purpose of injuring or killing another person; or
(v) violate item (i) or (ii) of this paragraph with a handgun loaded
with ammunition.
(2) There is a rebuttable presumption that a person who transports a
handgun under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection transports the handgun knowingly.
(c) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to the penalties provided in this subsection.
(2) If the person has not previously been convicted under this section, §
4–204 of this subtitle, or § 4–101 or § 4–102 of this title, OR IN ANOTHER STATE OR A
FEDERAL, MILITARY, OR NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBAL COURT OF A CRIME THAT, IF
COMMITTED IN THE STATE, WOULD CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, §
4–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR § 4–101 OR § 4–102 OF THIS TITLE:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, the person is
subject to imprisonment for not less than 30 days and not exceeding 5 years or a fine of not
less than $250 and not exceeding $2,500 or both; or
(ii) if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section, the
person shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than 90 days.
(3) (i) If the person has previously been convicted once under this
section, § 4–204 of this subtitle, or § 4–101 or § 4–102 of this title, OR IN ANOTHER STATE
OR A FEDERAL, MILITARY, OR NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBAL COURT OF A CRIME THAT,
IF COMMITTED IN THE STATE, WOULD CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION,
§ 4–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR § 4–101 OR § 4–102 OF THIS TITLE:
1. except as provided in item 2 of this subparagraph, the
person is subject to imprisonment for not less than 1 year and not exceeding 10 years; or
2. if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section,
the person is subject to imprisonment for not less than 3 years and not exceeding 10 years.

HOUSE BILL 1061 3
(ii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, the court may not impose less than the applicable minimum sentence
provided under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. If the person violates subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section,
the court may not suspend any part of or impose less than the applicable mandatory
minimum sentence provided under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) Except as provided in § 4–305 of the Correctional Services
Article, if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section, the person is not eligible
for parole during the mandatory minimum sentence.
(iv) A mandatory minimum sentence under subparagraph (ii)2 of this
paragraph may not be imposed unless the State’s Attorney notifies the defendant in writing
at least 30 days before trial of the State’s intention to seek the mandatory minimum
sentence.
(4) (i) If the person has previously been convicted more than once under
this section, § 4–204 of this subtitle, or § 4–101 or § 4–102 of this title, or of any combination
of these crimes, OR IN ANOTHER STATE OR A FEDERAL, MILITARY, OR NATIVE
AMERICAN TRIBAL COURT OF A CRIME THAT, IF COMMITTED IN THE STATE, WOULD
CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, § 4–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR § 4–101
OR § 4–102 OF THIS TITLE:
1. except as provided in item 2 of this subparagraph, the
person is subject to imprisonment for not less than 3 years and not exceeding 10 years; or
2. A. if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this
section, the person is subject to imprisonment for not less than 5 years and not exceeding
10 years; or
B. if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(iv) of this section,
the person is subject to imprisonment for not less than 5 years and not exceeding 10 years.
(ii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, the court may not impose less than the applicable minimum sentence
provided under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. If the person violates subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section,
the court may not suspend any part of or impose less than the applicable mandatory
minimum sentence provided under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) Except as provided in § 4–305 of the Correctional Services
Article, if the person violates subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section, the person is not eligible
for parole during the mandatory minimum sentence.

HOUSE BILL 1061
(iv) A mandatory minimum sentence under subparagraph (ii)2 of this
paragraph may not be imposed unless the State’s Attorney notifies the defendant in writing
at least 30 days before trial of the State’s intention to seek the mandatory minimum
sentence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.